Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,150
Moving a stopped, standing, or parked vehicle; yield right-of-way.

No person shall move a vehicle which is stopped, standing, or parked without yielding the right-of-way to all other vehicles and pedestrians affected by such movement and in no event until such movement can be made with reasonable safety.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 39;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-639;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 246.

At four-way stop signs, no driver has a preferred or favored status, and all have a duty to stop followed by a duty to use ordinary care as they proceed through the intersection. Salazar v. Nemec, 253 Neb. 298, 570 N.W.2d 366 (1997).